Illinois, session 104th, SB2193.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Sections 52-3.206, 10-20.88, and 34-18.88 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/2-3.206 new)7    Sec. 2-3.206. School ventilation document.8    (a) As used in this Section, "active classroom" means a 9room currently being used for any duration of in-person 10instruction.11    (b) Subject to appropriation, the State Board of 12Education, in consultation with the Department of Public 13Health, shall develop an educational document explaining, at a 14minimum, the values of good indoor air quality and shall 15supply the document in a Portable Document Format (PDF) to 16school districts within one year after an appropriation is 17made for this purpose.18    (c) Subject to appropriation, a school district shall 19supply all active classroom instructors, school staff, school 20administrators, and district leadership with the educational 21document developed by the State Board under subsection (b) in 22a PDF and a physical format.    SB2193- 2 -LRB104 12111 BAB 22210 b1    (105 ILCS 5/10-20.88 new)2    Sec. 10-20.88. School ventilation.3    (a) As used in this Section, "active classroom" means a 4room currently being used for any duration of in-person 5instruction.6    (b) Subject to funding from the State Board of Education 7from an appropriation made for this purpose, a school district 8shall ensure that all active classrooms that are not 9mechanically ventilated have at least 2 properly functioning 10windows, or one window in situations where only one is 11present, that can open and can safely stay open. A school 12district must be in compliance with this subsection within 2 13years after funding is made available to the school district 14for this purpose.15    (c) Subject to funding from the State Board of Education 16from an appropriation made for this purpose, a school district 17shall ensure that all active classrooms are equipped with an 18air quality monitor or sensor that is installed and operating. 19Each school shall record all incidents in which the 20recommended parts-per-million level was breached in a 21classroom and maintain those records for at least 5 years. An 22air quality monitor or sensor supplied under this subsection 23may not be shared between active classrooms.24    (d) Subject to funding from the State Board of Education 25from an appropriation made for this purpose, a school district 26shall ensure that all active classrooms are equipped with an   SB2193- 3 -LRB104 12111 BAB 22210 b1in-room air cleaner that is installed and operating. An 2in-room air cleaner supplied under this subsection may not be 3shared between active classrooms.4    (e) Subject to funding from the State Board of Education 5from an appropriation made for this purpose, a school district 6shall supply each school in the district with 5 additional 7in-room air cleaners and 5 additional air quality monitors or 8sensors to be used in the school health office, the school 9library, the school cafeteria, and other similar school 10spaces.11    (f) Subject to funding from the State Board of Education 12from an appropriation made for this purpose, the regional 13office of education or intermediate service center for a 14school district shall undertake a ventilation verification 15assessment of all mechanical ventilation systems in a school 16district. The ventilation verification assessment shall verify 17whether the existing mechanical ventilation system is 18operating in accordance with design parameters and meets the 19requirements of any applicable building codes. 20    (105 ILCS 5/34-18.88 new)21    Sec. 34-18.88. School ventilation.22    (a) As used in this Section, "active classroom" means a 23room currently being used for any duration of in-person 24instruction.25    (b) Subject to funding from the State Board of Education   SB2193- 4 -LRB104 12111 BAB 22210 b1from an appropriation made for this purpose, the school 2district shall ensure that all active classrooms that are not 3mechanically ventilated have at least 2 properly functioning 4windows, or one window in situations where only one is 5present, that can open and can safely stay open. The school 6district must be in compliance with this subsection within 2 7years after funding is made available to the school district 8for this purpose.9    (c) Subject to funding from the State Board of Education 10from an appropriation made for this purpose, the school 11district shall ensure that all active classrooms are equipped 12with an air quality monitor or sensor that is installed and 13operating. Each school shall record all incidents in which the 14recommended parts-per-million level was breached in a 15classroom and maintain those records for at least 5 years. An 16air quality monitor or sensor supplied under this subsection 17may not be shared between active classrooms.18    (d) Subject to funding from the State Board of Education 19from an appropriation made for this purpose, the school 20district shall ensure that all active classrooms are equipped 21with an in-room air cleaner that is installed and operating. 22An in-room air cleaner supplied under this subsection may not 23be shared between active classrooms.24    (e) Subject to funding from the State Board of Education 25from an appropriation made for this purpose, the school 26district shall supply each school in the district with 5   SB2193- 5 -LRB104 12111 BAB 22210 b1additional in-room air cleaners and 5 additional air quality 2monitors or sensors to be used in the school health office, the 3school library, the school cafeteria, and other similar school 4spaces.5    (f) Subject to funding from the State Board of Education 6from an appropriation made for this purpose, the State Board 7of Education shall undertake a ventilation verification 8assessment of all mechanical ventilation systems in the school 9district. The ventilation verification assessment shall verify 10whether the existing mechanical ventilation system is 11operating in accordance with design parameters and meets the 12requirements of any applicable building codes.